Hawaii statutes.
§662-10 Judgment as bar. The judgment
in an action under this chapter shall constitute a complete bar to any action
by the claimant, by reason of the same subject matter, against the employee of
the State whose act or omission gave rise to the claim. [L 1957, c 312, pt of
§1; Supp, §245A-10; HRS §662-10]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next